fi: Nuken tyyppi: Vauva; Keräilyesine; Pukeutua; Muoti; Historiallinen; Interaktiivinen; Muu
sv: Typ av docka: Bebis; Samlarobjekt; Klänning; Mode; Historiskt; Interaktiv; Övrigt
fr: Type de poupée: Bébé; Collection; À habiller; Mode; Historique; Interactif; Autre
en: Doll type: Baby; Collectible; Dress-up; Fashion; Historical; Interactive; Other
de: Puppentyp: Baby; Sammlerstück; Sich feinmachen; Mode; Historisch; Interaktiv; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Lėlės tipas: Kūdikiams; Kolekciniai; Aprengiamos; Madingos; Istorinės; Interaktyvios; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta lutke: Beba; Kolekcionarska; Za oblačenje; Modna; Povijesna; Interaktivna; Ostalo
tr: Bebek türü: Bebek; Koleksiyonluk; Giydirme; Moda; Tarihi; İnteraktif; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip păpușă: Bebeluș; De colecție; De îmbrăcat; Modă; Istorică; Interactivă; Altele
el: Τύπος κούκλας: Μωρό; Συλλεκτικό; Που αλλάζει φορεσιές; Μοδάτη; Ιστορική; Αλληλεπίδραση; Άλλο
ja: ドールタイプ: 赤ちゃん; コレクション; ドレスアップ; ファッション; ヒストリカル; インタラクティブ; その他
zh-TW: 娃娃類型: 嬰兒; 收藏品; 裝扮; 時尚; 歷史; 互動式; 其他
vi: Loại búp bê: Trẻ sơ sinh; Vật sưu tầm; Ăn diện; Thời trang; Lịch sử; Tương tác; Khác
sk-SK: Typ bábiky: Dieťatko; Zberateľský; Obliekanie; Móda; Historický; Interaktívny; Iné
bg-BG: Тип кукла: Бебе; Колекционерски; Преобличане; Мода; Исторически; Интерактивни; Други
nl: Type pop: Baby; Verzamelbaar; Aankleden; Mode; Historisch; Interactief; Andere
da: Dukketype: Baby; Samlerobjekt; Udklædning; Mode; Historie; Interaktiv; Andet
es: Tipo de muñeca: Bebé; Coleccionable; Permite el vestido; Moda; Histórico; Interactivo; Otros
pt-BR: Tipo de boneco: Bebê; Colecionável; Vestir; Moda; Histórico; Interativo; Outro
nb: Dukketype: Baby; Samleobjekt; Dress-up; Mote; Historisk; Interaktiv; Annet
zh-CN: 玩偶类型: 婴儿; 具有收藏价值; 装扮; 时尚; 历史; 互动零食; 其他
ko: 인형 타입: 아기; 수집용; 드레스업; 패션; 역사; 인터렉티브; 기타
hu: Játékbaba típusa: Csecsemő; Gyűjthető; Öltöztethető; Divat; Történelmi; Interaktív; Egyéb
cs: Typ panenky: Miminko; Sběratelské; Oblékací; Móda; Historické; Interaktivní; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de boneca: Bebé; Cobrável; Vestir-se com elegância; Moda; Histórico; Interativo; Outro
ru: Тип куклы: Для младенцев; Коллекционный; Переодевание; Мода; Исторический; Интерактивный; Другой
it: Tipo di bambola: Neonato; Da collezione; Vestirsi; Moda; Storico; Interattivo; Altro
pl: Rodzaj lalki: Niemowlę; Kolekcjonerskie; Przebieranki; Moda; Historyczny; Interaktywne; Inne
th: ประเภทตุ๊กตา: ชนิดเด็กทารก; แบบของสะสม; แบบแต่งตัว; แฟชั่น; แบบอิงประวัติศาสตร์; แบบโต้ตอบ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta lutke: Dojenček; Zbirateljska; Oblačenje; Modna; Zgodovinska; Interaktivna; Drugo